Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. Hospital and Nursing Home Licensure and Inspection.

§ 32.1-123.
Definitions.

As used in this article unless a different meaning or construction is clearly required by the context or otherwise:

“Certified nursing facility”
means any skilled nursing facility, skilled care facility, intermediate care facility, nursing or nursing care facility, or nursing home, whether freestanding or a portion of a freestanding medical care facility, that is certified as a Medicare or Medicaid provider, or both, pursuant to §

32.1-137

.

“Children’s hospital”
means a hospital (i) whose inpatients are predominantly under 18 years of age and (ii) which is excluded from the Medicare prospective payment system pursuant to the Social Security Act.

“Class I violation”
means failure of a nursing home or certified nursing facility to comply with one or more requirements of state or federal law or regulations which creates a situation that presents an immediate and serious threat to patient health or safety.

“Class II violation”
means a pattern of noncompliance by a nursing home or certified nursing facility with one or more federal conditions of participation which indicates delivery of substandard quality of care but does not necessarily create an immediate and serious threat to patient health and safety. Regardless of whether the facility participates in Medicare or Medicaid, the federal conditions of participation shall be the standards for Class II violations.

“Hospital”
means any facility licensed pursuant to this article in which the primary function is the provision of diagnosis, of treatment, and of medical and nursing services, surgical or nonsurgical, for two or more nonrelated individuals, including hospitals known by varying nomenclature or designation such as children’s hospitals, sanatoriums, sanitariums and general, acute, rehabilitation, chronic disease, short-term, long-term, outpatient surgical, and inpatient or outpatient maternity hospitals.

“Immediate and serious threat”
means a situation or condition having a high probability that serious harm or injury to patients could occur at any time, or already has occurred, and may occur again, if patients are not protected effectively from the harm, or the threat is not removed.

“Inspection”
means all surveys, inspections, investigations and other procedures necessary for the Department of Health to perform in order to carry out various obligations imposed on the Board or Commissioner by applicable state and federal laws and regulations.

“Nursing home”
means any facility or any identifiable component of any facility licensed pursuant to this article in which the primary function is the provision, on a continuing basis, of nursing services and health-related services for the treatment and inpatient care of two or more nonrelated individuals, including facilities known by varying nomenclature or designation such as convalescent homes, skilled nursing facilities or skilled care facilities, intermediate care facilities, extended care facilities and nursing or nursing care facilities.

“Nonrelated”
means not related by blood or marriage, ascending or descending or first degree full or half collateral.

“Substandard quality of care”
means deficiencies in practices of patient care, preservation of patient rights, environmental sanitation, physical plant maintenance, or life safety which, if not corrected, will have a significant harmful effect on patient health and safety.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-298; 1964, c. 54; 1973, c. 477; 1979, c. 711; 1989, c. 618; 2011, c. 433.

Cross references.

As to community-based continuing care providers, see §

38.2-4918

et seq. As to filing petition for appointment of guardian or conservator, see §

64.2-2001

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, c. 730, provides: “§ 1. The Commissioner of Health shall convene a work group, utilizing to the extent practicable any ongoing work group, to clarify state and federal requirements and develop guidelines applicable to nursing facility resident transfers and discharges, including but not limited to related notice requirements and transfer procedures for inpatient medical care. The work group shall consist of five representatives of the Virginia Elder Rights Coalition; a total of five representatives of providers designated jointly by the Virginia Hospital & Healthcare Association, the Virginia Health Care Association and the Virginia Association of Nonprofit Homes for the Aging; two representatives of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services; one representative of community services boards; one representative of the Department of Medical Assistance Services; one representative of the Virginia Academy of Emergency Physicians; and a representative of the Virginia Bar Association. The Commissioner will report the work group’s progress to the Secretary of Health and Human Resources and the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Education and Health and the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions by December 1, 2012.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 433 added the definition for “Children’s hospital”; and inserted “children’s hospitals” in the definition for “Hospital.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on governmental services and social welfare for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 301 (1980).

For note on permissible limits of abortion regulation in light of Simopoulos v. Virginia, 462 U.S. 506, 103 S. Ct. 2532, 76 L. Ed. 2d 755 (1983).

see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 137 (1983).

For article on the admissibility of written health care standards in medical and hospital negligence actions in Virginia, see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 725 (1984).

For survey on construction law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 541 (1989).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Administrative Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 7 (2012).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Hospitals and Sanitariums, § 7.

§ 32.1-124.
Exemptions.

The provisions of §§

32.1-123

through

32.1-136

shall not be applicable to: (i) a dispensary or first-aid facility maintained by any commercial or industrial plant, educational institution or convent; (ii) an institution licensed by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services; (iii) an institution or portion thereof licensed by the State Board of Social Services; (iv) a hospital or nursing home owned or operated by an agency of the United States government; (v) an office of one or more physicians or surgeons unless such office is used principally for performing surgery; and (vi) a hospital or nursing home, as defined in §

32.1-123

, owned or operated by an agency of the Commonwealth unless such hospital or nursing home or portion thereof is certified as a nursing facility pursuant to §

32.1-137

.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-298; 1964, c. 54; 1973, c. 477; 1979, c. 711; 1989, c. 618; 2009, cc. 813, 840.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “State Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services Board” in clause (ii).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Hospitals and Sanitariums, § 7.

§ 32.1-125.
Establishment or operation of hospitals and nursing homes prohibited without license or certification; licenses not transferable.

No person shall own, establish, conduct, maintain, manage or operate in this Commonwealth any hospital or nursing home unless such hospital or nursing home is licensed or certified as provided in this article.

No license issued hereunder shall be assignable or transferable.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-299; 1979, c. 711; 1989, c. 618.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Constitutionality. —

Commonwealth has authority to promulgate regulations for facilities in which first trimester abortions are performed as well as for providers of first trimester abortions, so long as the regulations adhere to constitutional limitations. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Ralph K. Smith, Member, Senate of Virginia,
2010 Va. AG LEXIS 45 (8/20/10); Opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert G. Marshall, Member, House of Delegates, 10-012,
(8/20/10).

§ 32.1-125.01.
Failing to report; penalty.

Any hospital or nursing home that has not paid civil penalties assessed for failing to report pursuant to § 54.1-2400.6 shall not be issued a license or certification or a renewal of such.

History.

2003, cc. 753, 762; 2004, c. 64.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 64 substituted “54.1-2400.6” for “54.1-2906.”

§ 32.1-125.1.
Inspection of hospitals by state agencies generally.

As used in this section unless the context requires a different meaning, “hospital” means a hospital as defined in §

32.1-123

or

37.2-100

.

State agencies shall make or cause to be made only such inspections of hospitals as are necessary to carry out the various obligations imposed on each agency by applicable state and federal laws and regulations. Any on-site inspection by a state agency or a division or unit thereof that substantially complies with the inspection requirements of any other state agency or any other division or unit of the inspecting agency charged with making similar inspections shall be accepted as an equivalent inspection in lieu of an on-site inspection by said agency or by a division or unit of the inspecting agency. A state agency shall coordinate its hospital inspections both internally and with those required by other state agencies so as to ensure that the requirements of this section are met. No hospital shall receive additional inspections until all other licensed hospitals in the Commonwealth have also been inspected, unless the additional inspections are (i) necessary to follow up on a preoperational inspection or one or more violations, (ii) required by a uniformly applied risk-based schedule established by the Department, (iii) necessary to investigate a complaint regarding the hospital, or (iv) otherwise deemed necessary by the Commissioner or his designee to protect the health and safety of the public.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, all hospitals licensed by the Department of Health or Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services that have been certified under the provisions of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act for hospital or psychiatric services or that have obtained accreditation from a national accrediting organization granted authority by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to ensure compliance with Medicare conditions of participation pursuant to § 1865 of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1395bb) may be subject to inspections so long as such certification or accreditation is maintained but only to the extent necessary to ensure the public health and safety.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-300.1; 1979, c. 220; 1989, c. 618; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2014, c. 320; 2017, c. 465.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1979 act having assigned no number.

Cross references.

As to the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman having access to individuals’, facilities’ and patients’ records, see §

51.5-183

.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and deleted the section symbol preceding “37.2-100” in the first paragraph and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” near the beginning of the third paragraph.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 320 in the last paragraph substituted “that” for “which” twice and “a national accrediting organization granted authority by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to ensure compliance with Medicare conditions of participation pursuant to § 1865 of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1395bb)” for “the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 465 added the last sentence in the second paragraph.

Law Review.

For article on the admissibility of written health care standards in medical and hospital negligence actions in Virginia, see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 725 (1984).

§ 32.1-125.2.
Disclosure of other providers of services.

Any hospital which has, or is affiliated with or under the common control of a holding company that has, a financial interest in a facility or entity that engages in the provision of health-related outpatient services, appliances or devices of which a patient is in need, or any employee or volunteer associated with such hospital, shall, prior to referring the patient to such type of a facility or entity, provide the patient or his representative with a notice stating in bold print that the services, appliances or devices may be available from other suppliers in the community.
A. 1. Any hospital which has, or is affiliated with or under the common control of a holding company that has, a financial interest in a facility or entity that engages in the provision of health-related outpatient services, appliances or devices of which a patient is in need, or any employee or volunteer associated with such hospital, shall, prior to referring the patient to such type of a facility or entity, provide the patient or his representative with a notice stating in bold print that the services, appliances or devices may be available from other suppliers in the community.

As used in this section, “representative” means any member of the immediate family of the patient or any other person acting on his behalf and who is not a health care provider or other person who may profit from such referral.

The Attorney General, an attorney for the Commonwealth, the attorney for a city, county or town or any aggrieved patient may cause an action to be brought in the appropriate circuit court in the name of the Commonwealth, of the county, city or town, or of any aggrieved patient, to enjoin any violation of this section. The circuit court having jurisdiction may enjoin such violations, notwithstanding the existence of an adequate remedy at law. When an injunction is issued, the circuit court shall impose a civil fine to be paid to the Literary Fund not to exceed $1,000. In any action under this section, it shall not be necessary that damages be proved.

History.

1988, c. 252.

Law Review.

For survey on evidence in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 647 (1989).

§ 32.1-125.3.
Bed capacity and licensure in hospitals designated as critical access hospitals; designation as rural hospital.

Any medical care facility licensed as a hospital pursuant to this article that (i) has been certified, as provided in §

32.1-122.07

, as a critical access hospital by the Commissioner of Health in compliance with the certification regulations promulgated by the Health Care Financing Administration pursuant to Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, as amended, and (ii) has, as a result of the critical access certification, been required to reduce its licensed bed capacity to conform to the critical access certification requirement shall, upon termination of its critical access hospital certification, be licensed to operate at the licensed bed capacity in existence prior to the critical access hospital certification without being required to apply for and obtain a certificate of public need for such bed capacity in accordance with Article 1.1 (§

32.1-102.1

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of this title.

Any medical care facility licensed as a hospital shall be considered a rural hospital on and after September 30, 2004, pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1395ww(d)(8)(E)(ii)(II), if (i) the hospital is located in an area defined as rural by federal statute or regulation; (ii) the Board of Health defines, in regulation, the area in which the hospital is located as a rural health area or the hospital as a rural hospital; or (iii) the hospital was designated, prior to October 1, 2004, as a Medicare-dependent small rural health hospital, as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1395ww(d)(5)(G)(iv).

History.

2001, c. 579; 2006, c. 378.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 378 inserted the subsection A designation and added subsection B.

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in health care law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 199 (2002).

§ 32.1-125.4.
Retaliation or discrimination against complainants.

No hospital may retaliate or discriminate in any manner against any person who (i) in good faith complains or provides information to, or otherwise cooperates with, the Department or any other agency of government or any person or entity operating under contract with an agency of government having responsibility for protecting the rights of patients of hospitals, or (ii) attempts to assert any right protected by state or federal law.

History.

2003, c. 309.

§ 32.1-125.5.
Confidentiality of complainant’s identity.

Whenever the Department conducts inspections and investigations in response to complaints received from the public, the identity of the complainant and the identity of any patient who is the subject of the complaint, or identified therein, shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open to inspection by members of the public. Nothing contained herein shall prevent the Department, in its discretion, from disclosing to the hospital the nature of the complaint or the identity of the patient who is the subject of the complaint. Nothing contained herein shall prevent the Department or its employees from making reports under §

63.2-1509

or Article 2 (§

63.2-1603

et seq.) of Chapter 16 of Title 63.2. If the Department intends to rely, in whole or in part, on any statements made by the complainant, at any administrative hearing brought against the hospital, the Department shall disclose the identity of the complainant to the hospital in a reasonable time in advance of such hearing.

History.

2003, c. 309.

§ 32.1-126.
Commissioner to inspect and to issue licenses to or assure compliance with certification requirements for hospitals, nursing homes, and certified nursing facilities; notice of denial of license; consultative advice and assistance; notice to electric utilities.

Pursuant to this article, the Commissioner shall issue licenses to, and assure compliance with certification requirements for hospitals and nursing homes, and assure compliance with certification requirements for facilities owned or operated by agencies of the Commonwealth as defined in subdivision (vi) of §

32.1-124

, which after inspection are found to be in compliance with the provisions of this article and with all applicable state and federal regulations. The Commissioner shall notify by certified mail or by overnight express mail any applicant denied a license of the reasons for such denial.

The Commissioner shall cause each and every hospital, nursing home, and certified nursing facility to be inspected periodically, but not less often than biennially, in accordance with the provisions of this article and regulations of the Board. However, except when performed in conjunction with an inspection required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, no hospital, nursing home, or certified nursing facility shall receive additional inspections until all other hospitals, nursing homes, or certified nursing facilities in the Commonwealth, respectively, have also been inspected, unless the additional inspections are (i) necessary to follow up on a preoperational inspection or one or more violations; (ii) required by a uniformly applied risk-based schedule established by the Department; (iii) necessary to investigate a complaint regarding the hospital, nursing home, or certified nursing facility; or (iv) otherwise deemed necessary by the Commissioner or his designee to protect the health and safety of the public.Unless expressly prohibited by federal statute or regulation, the findings of the Commissioner, with respect to periodic surveys of nursing facilities conducted pursuant to the Survey, Certification, and Enforcement Procedures set forth in 42 C.F.R. Part 488, shall be considered case decisions pursuant to the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) and shall be subject to the Department’s informal dispute resolution procedures, or, at the option of the Department or the nursing facility, the formal fact-finding procedures under §

2.2-4020

. The Commonwealth shall be deemed the proponent for purposes of §

2.2-4020

. Further, notwithstanding the provisions of clause (iii) of subsection A of §

2.2-4025

, such case decisions shall also be subject to the right to court review pursuant to Article 5 (§

2.2-4025

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2.

The Commissioner may, in accordance with regulations of the Board, provide for consultative advice and assistance, with such limitations and restrictions as he deems proper, to any person who intends to apply for a hospital or nursing home license or nursing facility certification.

For the purpose of facilitating the prompt restoration of electrical service and prioritization of customers during widespread power outages, the Commissioner shall notify on a quarterly basis all electric utilities serving customers in Virginia as to the location of all nursing homes licensed in the Commonwealth. The requirements of this subsection shall be met if the Commissioner maintains such information on an electronic database accessible by electric utilities serving customers in Virginia.

No person shall use, in any advertisement for professional services provided by such person, the results of any survey, inspection, or investigation of a nursing home or certified nursing facility conducted by a state or federal agency, including any statement of deficiencies, finding of deficiencies, or plan of corrective action, unless the advertisement includes all of the following:

The date on which the survey, inspection, or investigation was conducted;

A statement that the nursing home or certified nursing facility is required to submit a plan of correction in response to every statement of deficiency;

If a finding or deficiency cited in a statement of deficiencies has been corrected, a statement that the finding or deficiency has been corrected and the date on which the finding or deficiency was corrected; and

A statement that the advertisement is not authorized or endorsed by the Virginia Department of Health, the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the Office of the Inspector General, or any other governmental agency.The information required by this subsection shall be in the same color, font, and size as all other language on or in the advertisement and shall appear as prominently as all other language used in the advertisement. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the results of a survey, inspection, or investigation from being used in any administrative proceeding, civil proceeding, or criminal investigation or prosecution, in accordance with the rules set forth by the applicable tribunal.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 32-300, 32-305; 1977, c. 155; 1979, c. 711; 1989, c. 618; 1996, cc. 940, 999; 2000, c. 967; 2002, c. 514; 2004, c. 304; 2017, c. 465; 2018, c. 453; 2019, cc. 291, 292.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 967 added the second paragraph of subsection B.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by ch. 514, in the second paragraph of subsection B, substituted “Unless expressly” for “To the extent not” at the beginning of the first sentence, substituted “the Department’s informal dispute resolution procedures, or, at the option of the Department or the nursing facility, the formal fact-finding procedures under §

2.2-4020

” for “Article 3 (§

2.2-4019

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2” at the end of that sentence, and inserted the present second sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 304 added subsection D.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 465 added the second sentence in the first paragraph of subsection B.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 453, effective March 23, 2018, substituted “when performed in conjunction with an inspection required” for “as required” in the second sentence in subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 291 and 292 are identical, and added subsection E.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia health law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 853 (2000).

§ 32.1-126.01.
Employment for compensation of persons convicted of barrier crimes prohibited; criminal records check required; suspension or revocation of license.

A licensed nursing home shall not hire for compensated employment persons who have been convicted of any offense set forth in clause (i) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

. However, a licensed nursing home may hire an applicant who has been convicted of one such offense punishable as a misdemeanor that does not involve abuse or neglect if five years have elapsed following the conviction.Any person desiring to work at a licensed nursing home shall provide the hiring facility with a sworn statement or affirmation disclosing any criminal convictions or any pending criminal charges, whether within or outside the Commonwealth. Any person making a materially false statement when providing such sworn statement or affirmation regarding any such offense is guilty upon conviction of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Further dissemination of the information provided pursuant to this section is prohibited other than to a federal or state authority or court as may be required to comply with an express requirement of law for such further dissemination.A nursing home shall, within 30 days of employment, obtain for any compensated employees an original criminal record clearance with respect to convictions for offenses specified in this section or an original criminal history record from the Central Criminal Records Exchange. However, no employee shall be permitted to work in a position that involves direct contact with a patient until an original criminal record clearance or original criminal history record has been received, unless such person works under the direct supervision of another employee for whom a background check has been completed in accordance with the requirements of this section. The provisions of this section shall be enforced by the Commissioner. If an applicant is denied employment because of convictions appearing on his criminal history record, the nursing home shall provide a copy of the information obtained from the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the applicant.The provisions of this section shall not apply to volunteers who work with the permission or under the supervision of a person who has received a clearance pursuant to this section.

A person who complies in good faith with the provisions of this section shall not be liable for any civil damages for any act or omission in the performance of duties under this section unless the act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct.

A licensed nursing home shall notify and provide to all students a copy of the provisions of this section prior to or upon enrollment in a certified nurse aide program operated by such nursing home.

History.

1992, c. 844; 1993, cc. 17, 657; 1999, c. 637; 2001, c. 329; 2003, c. 517; 2006, cc. 701, 764; 2012, c. 383; 2014, c. 129; 2017, c. 809.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 744, which rewrote this section, in cl. 2 provided: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation of funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act for the period of July 1, 2006, through July 30, 2008, and passed during the 2007 Session of the General Assembly and signed into law by the Governor. If such funds are appropriated, then the provisions of this act shall become affective July 1, 2007.” The funding was not provided and the section has been set out above without the amendments by Acts 2006, c. 744.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 329 rewrote the first paragraph of subsection A, which formerly read: “A licensed nursing home shall not hire for compensated employment, persons who have been convicted of murder, abduction for immoral purposes as set out in §

18.2-48

, assaults and bodily woundings as set out in Article 4 §§

18.2-51

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 18.2, robbery as set out in §

18.2-58

, sexual assault as set out in Article 7 §§

18.2-61

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 18.2, arson as set out in Article 1 §§

18.2-77

et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 18.2, pandering as set out in §

18.2-355

, crimes against nature involving children as set out in §

18.2-361

, taking indecent liberties with children as set out in §

18.2-370

or §

18.2-370.1

, abuse and neglect of children as set out in §

18.2-371.1

, failure to secure medical attention for an injured child as set out in §

18.2-314

, obscenity offenses as set out in §

18.2-374.1

or §

18.2-379

, or abuse or neglect of an incapacitated adult as set out in §

18.2-369

. However, a licensed nursing home may hire an applicant who has been convicted of one misdemeanor specified in this section not involving abuse or neglect or moral turpitude, provided five years have elapsed following the conviction.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 517, in subsection A, in the first paragraph, inserted “or manslaughter” following “murder,” substituted “carjacking” for “car jacking,” substituted “threats of death or bodily injury” for “extortion by threat,” substituted “felony stalking” for “any felony stalking violation,” deleted “or §

18.2-379

” following “§

18.2-374.1

,” and substituted “abuse and neglect of incapacitated adults” for “or abuse or neglect of an incapacitated adult”; and substituted “30” for “thirty” in the third paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 701 and 764 are identical, and substituted “if” for “or moral turpitude, provided” in the last sentence of the first paragraph of subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 383, in subsection A, in the first sentence of the first paragraph, inserted “a felony violation of a protective order as set out in § 16.1-253.2,” “or B” preceding “of §

18.2-47

,” “extortion by threat as set out in §

18.2-59

,” and “a felony violation of a protective order as set out in §

18.2-60.4

.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 129, in the third paragraph of subsection A, added the second sentence.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 809 rewrote the first paragraph in subsection A, which listed specific criminal offenses; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 32.1-126.02.
Hospital pharmacy employees; criminal records check required.

A licensed hospital shall obtain, within sixty days of employment of any compensated employee of the hospital whose duties will provide access to controlled substances as defined in § 54.1-3401 within the hospital pharmacy, who is not licensed by the Board of Pharmacy, an original criminal history record information from the Central Criminal Records Exchange. The cost of obtaining the criminal history record information shall be borne by the hospital.Any person applying to work in a hospital whose duties will provide access to controlled substances as defined in § 54.1-3401 within the hospital pharmacy, who is not licensed by the Board of Pharmacy, shall provide the hiring facility with a sworn statement or affirmation disclosing any criminal convictions or any pending criminal charges, whether within or without the Commonwealth. Any person making a materially false statement when providing such sworn statement or affirmation shall be guilty upon conviction of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Further dissemination of the information provided pursuant to this section is prohibited other than to a federal or state authority or court as may be required to comply with an express requirement of law for such further dissemination.The provisions of this section shall be enforced by the Commissioner. If an individual is denied or terminated from employment because of convictions appearing on his criminal history record, the hospital shall provide, upon the written request of the individual, a copy of the information obtained from the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the individual.

A person who complies in good faith with the provisions of this section shall not be liable for any civil damages for any act or omission in the performance of duties under this section unless the act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct.

History.

1996, c. 428.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 32.1-126.1.
Asbestos inspection for hospitals.

The Commissioner shall not issue a license to or renew the license of any hospital which is located in a building built prior to 1978 until he receives a written statement that either (i) the hospital has been inspected for asbestos in accordance with standards in effect at the time of inspection; or (ii) that asbestos inspection will be conducted within twelve months of issuance or renewal, in accordance with the standards established pursuant to §

2.2-1164

in the case of state-owned buildings or §

36-99.7

in the case of all other buildings; and (iii) that response actions have been or will be undertaken in accordance with applicable standards. Any asbestos management program or response action undertaken by a hospital shall comply with the standards promulgated pursuant to §

2.2-1164

in the case of state-owned buildings or §

36-99.7

in the case of all others.

The Commissioner may amend the standards for inspections, management programs and response actions for hospitals subject to this section, in accordance with the requirements of the Virginia Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

The provisions of Article 1.1 (§

32.1-102.1

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of this title shall not apply to expenditures made by hospitals pursuant to the provisions of this section.

History.

1987, c. 654; 1988, c. 723; 1989, c. 398; 1993, c. 660.

Cross references.

As to the Commonwealth’s immunity from civil liability for asbestos abatement, see §

2.2-1167

.

Law Review.

For article, “What’s Current in Asbestos Regulations,” see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 375 (1989).

For survey of administrative procedure in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 431 (1989).

For survey on construction law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 541 (1989).

§ 32.1-126.2.
Fire suppression systems required in nursing facilities and nursing homes.

After January 1, 1993, the Commissioner shall not issue a license to or renew the license of any nursing facility or nursing home, regardless of when such institution was constructed, unless the nursing facility or nursing home is equipped with a fire suppression system which complies with the regulations of the Board of Housing and Community Development.

Units consisting of certified long-term care beds described in this section and §

36-99.9

located on the ground floor of general hospitals shall be exempt from the requirements of this section.

History.

1990, c. 804.

§ 32.1-126.3.
Fire suppression systems required in hospitals.

After January 1, 1998, the Commissioner shall not issue a license to or renew the license of any hospital, regardless of when such facility was constructed, unless the hospital is equipped with an automatic sprinkler system which complies with the regulations of the Board of Housing and Community Development.

The Commissioner may, at his discretion, extend the time for compliance with this section for any hospital that can demonstrate (i) its inability to comply, if such hospital submits, prior to January 1, 1998, a plan for compliance by a date certain which shall be no later than July 1, 1998, or (ii) that construction is underway for a new facility to house the services currently located in the noncomplying facility and that such construction will be completed and the noncomplying facility relocated by December 31, 1998.

The provisions of Article 1.1 (§

32.1-102.1

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of this title shall not apply to expenditures required solely for compliance with this section.

For the purposes of this section and §

36-99.9:1

, “automatic sprinkler system” means a device for suppressing fire in patient rooms and other areas of the hospital customarily used for patient care.

History.

1995, c. 631; 1997, c. 552.

§ 32.1-126.4.
Hospital standing orders or protocols for certain vaccinations.

A hospital may provide or arrange for the administration under a standing order or protocol approved by a member or committee of the hospital’s medical staff of (i) influenza vaccinations and (ii) pneumococcal vaccinations, thus waiving the requirement for specific written physician orders for influenza and pneumococcal immunizations. However, no such standing order or protocol shall supersede a physician’s authority to issue specific written orders relating to immunizations.

Any standing order or protocol authorized by this section shall require that the vaccinations be administered in accordance with the most recent recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention after (i) ascertaining that the vaccination is not medically contraindicated for the patient, (ii) determining the patient’s wishes and any religious objections, and (iii) obtaining informed consent from the patient or his legal representative.

Vaccinations administered under a standing order or protocol shall be documented in the patient’s health record.

History.

2006, c. 432.

§ 32.1-126.5.
Consolidation of inspections.

The Commissioner shall identify any inspection of a medical care facility required by this title, Board regulations, the Commissioner, the Department, or any other state regulatory boards or agencies and shall, in collaboration with any such inspecting entity, work to consolidate, as much as practicable, all such inspections in order to minimize the interruption of the provision of care in such medical care facilities.

History.

2019, c. 95.